Utah statutes.
78B-6-704.   Prayer for damages.

No dollar amount shall be specified in the prayer of a complaint filed in a product liability action against a product manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer.  The complaint shall merely pray for such damages as are reasonable in the premises.

